Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.010

Park and recreation districts authorized—"Recreational facilities" defined.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5365-S.SL) ***

Park and recreation districts are hereby authorized to be formed as municipal corporations for the purpose of providing leisure time activities and facilities and recreational facilities, of a nonprofit nature as a public service to the residents of the geographical areas included within their boundaries.

The term "recreational facilities" means parks, playgrounds, gymnasiums, swimming pools, field houses, bathing beaches, stadiums, golf courses, automobile racetracks and drag strips, coliseums for the display of spectator sports, public campgrounds, boat ramps and launching sites, public hunting and fishing areas, arboretums, bicycle and bridle paths, senior citizen centers, community centers, and other recreational facilities.

[ 1991 c 363 s 79; 1990 c 32 s 1; 1972 ex.s. c 94 s 1; 1969 c 26 s 1; 1967 c 63 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.69.010. Prior: 1961 c 272 s 1; 1959 c 304 s 1; 1957 c 58 s 1.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.